Utah statutes.
17B-1-701.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Audit reports" means the reports of any independent audit of the
district performed by:
(a)  an independent auditor as required by Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting
Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local
Entities Act;
(b)  the state auditor; or
(c)  the legislative auditor.
(2)  "Board" means the local district board of trustees.
(3)  "Budget" means a plan of financial operations for a fiscal year that
includes:
(a)  estimates of proposed expenditures for given purposes and the proposed
means of financing them;
(b)  the source and amount of estimated revenue for the district for the
fiscal year;
(c)  fund balance in each fund at the beginning of the fiscal year and the
projected fund balance for each fund at the end of the fiscal year; and
(d)  capital projects or budgets for proposed construction or improvement to
capital facilities within the district.
(4)  "Constituent entity" means any county, city, or town that levies property
taxes within the boundaries of the district.
(5) (a)  "Customer agencies" means those governmental entities, except school
districts, institutions of higher education, and federal government agencies
that purchase or obtain services from the local district.
(b)  "Customer agencies" for purposes of state agencies means the state
auditor.
